Arkansas, session 2025, SB317.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 6, Chapter 60, Subchapter 1, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
6-60-123. Prohibition on activities with prohibited foreign party —
Definition.
(a) As used in this section, "prohibited foreign party" means the same
as defined in § 18-11-802.
(b) An institution of higher education shall not participate in the
following activities with a prohibited foreign party:
(1) Conduct classified research;
*CRH050*
03-06-2025 14:17:03 CRH050

As Engrossed: S3/6/25 SB317
(2) Conduct agricultural research under a contract;
(3) Sell agricultural products, including without limitation
seeds;
(4) Engage in the production of agricultural products; or
(5) Enter into a nondisclosure agreement.

/s/B. Johnson





























03-06-2025 14:17:03 CRH050